Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Forest Pest Control

149.610.
Purpose of KRS 149.610 to 149.680.

The purpose of KRS 149.610 to 149.680 is to place in the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the authority and responsibility to control infestations or infections by insects or disease, which are hereby declared to be a public nuisance, in order to protect and preserve forest resources, enhance the growth and maintenance of forests, promote stability of forest-using industries, aid in fire control by reducing the menace created by dying and dead trees, conserve forest cover on watersheds, and protect recreational, wildlife and other values of the forests of the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 1, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 167, effective July 15, 2010.

149.620.
Duty of secretary for energy and environment.

The secretary for energy and environment shall make surveys and investigations to determine the threat or presence of infestations and control of forest pests. For this purpose duly designated representatives of the secretary may enter at reasonable times on public and private lands for the purpose of conducting such surveys, investigations and controls.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 2, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 168, effective July 15, 2010.

149.630.
Control zone to be prescribed — Notice required.

Whenever the secretary for energy and environment finds that any forest area is infested, threatened to be infested, infected, or threatened to be infected with insects or disease, he shall determine whether measures of control are needed and are available and the area over which the control measures shall be applied. He shall prescribe the proposed zone in which control measures are to be applied, and shall publish notice of the proposal, as required by law. Such notice shall include a brief description of the location of the proposed zone of infestation or infection and the approximate time when control measures will be executed.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 3, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 169, effective July 15, 2010.

149.640.
Control measures may be applied — Agreements with landowners — Cost.

The secretary for energy and environment may apply measures of infestation and infection control on public and private forests and other lands anywhere in the Commonwealth, to any trees, timber, plants or shrubs thereon harboring or which may harbor any insects or disease. The secretary may enter into agreements with owners of such lands covering the control work on their lands, and fix the pro rata basis on which the cost of such work will be shared between the Commonwealth and said owner; provided, that the failure of the secretary to offer an agreement to or execute an agreement with any owner shall not impair the right of the secretary’s representatives to enter on the lands of said owner to conduct control operations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 4, effective June 16, 1960; 1982, ch. 142, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 170, effective July 15, 2010.

149.650.
Authority to control other holdings — Cost.

The secretary for energy and environment is authorized to carry out control work on other adjacent or interior holdings, which, if uncontrolled, would cause a reinfestation or reinfection of the controlled area, and to contract with owners of land in the affected area relative to payment of the cost of such work.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 5, effective June 16, 1960; 1982, ch. 142, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 171, effective July 15, 2010.

149.660.
Cooperation with other agencies.

The secretary for energy and environment may cooperate with the federal government or agencies thereof, other agencies of the Commonwealth, county or municipal governments, agencies of neighboring states, or other public or private organizations, or individuals and may accept such funds, equipment, supplies or services from cooperators and others as may be deemed appropriate. The secretary may provide in agreements with the federal government or its agencies for matching of federal funds as required under federal laws relating to forest pests.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 6, effective June 16, 1960; 2010, ch. 24, § 172, effective July 15, 2010.

149.670.
Revolving fund account provided.

All moneys collected under the provisions of KRS 149.610 to 149.680, including such as may be contributed or paid by the federal government or any other public or private agency, organization or individual, shall be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of a revolving , trust or agency fund account for use by the Energy and Environment Cabinet in carrying out the purposes of KRS 149.610 to 149.680.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 7, effective June 16, 1960; 2010, ch. 24, § 173, effective July 15, 2010.

149.680.
Personnel — Equipment — Regulations.

The secretary for energy and environment is authorized as required by law, to employ necessary personnel, procure necessary equipment, supplies and services; to enter into contracts in the name of the secretary and to provide funds to any agency of the United States for work or services under the forest pest control program. The secretary for energy and environment may prescribe rules and regulations for carrying out the purposes of KRS 149.610 to 149.680.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 95, § 8, effective June 16, 1960; Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 174, effective July 15, 2010.